Alaska, session 34, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 47.06 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 47.06.035. Summer electronic benefits transfer program for children. 05 (a) The department shall do all things necessary to qualify for federal funds that are 06 available to the state for the summer electronic benefits transfer program and 07 administer the summer electronic benefits transfer program. 08 (b) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the summer 09 electronic benefits transfer program. 10 (c) In this section, "summer electronic benefits transfer program" means the 11 federal summer electronic benefits transfer program for children authorized by 42 12 U.S.C. 1762. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.